Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2609
Nuisance; injunction.

The department may apply to the district court in the county in which such junkyards may be located for an injunction to abate such nuisance or for such other relief as may be necessary or proper.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 9.